Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-111] Required information.
A limited partnership shall maintain at its registered office the following
information:

(1) A current list showing the full name and last
known street and mailing address of each partner, separately identifying the general
partners, in alphabetical order, and the limited partners, in alphabetical
order;

(2) A copy of the certificate of limited partnership
and all amendments to and restatements of the certificate, together with signed
copies of any powers of attorney under which any certificate, amendment, or
restatement has been executed;

(3) A copy of any filed articles of conversion or
merger;

(4) A copy of the limited partnership's federal,
state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three most
recent years;

(5) A copy of any partnership agreement made in a
record and any amendment made in a record to any partnership agreement;

(6) A copy of any financial statement of the limited
partnership for the three most recent years;

(7) A copy of the three most recent annual statements
delivered by the limited partnership to the director pursuant to section
425E-210;

(8) A copy of any record made by the limited
partnership during the past three years of any consent given by or vote taken
of any partner pursuant to this chapter or the partnership agreement; and

(9) Unless contained in a partnership agreement made
in a record, a record stating:

(A) The amount of cash, and a description and
statement of the agreed value of any other property or services, contributed or
agreed to be contributed by each partner;

(B) The time or events that trigger any
additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

(C) Unless contained in a written partnership
agreement, a writing setting out any right of a partner to receive, or of a
general partner to make, distributions to a partner which include a return of
all or any part of the partner's contribution;

(D) For any person that is both a general
partner and a limited partner, a specification of what transferable interest
the person owns in each capacity; and

(E) Any events upon the happening of which
the limited partnership is to be dissolved and its activities wound up. [L
2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next